Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 51 Organized Criminal Gambling

11-51-1.
Definitions.

“Gambling” includes, but is not limited to, pool-selling, bookmaking, maintaining slot-machines, roulette wheels or dice tables, and conducting lotteries, Policy, Bolita, or numbers games or selling chances in them.

“Organized criminal gambling business” as used in this chapter means a gambling business which involves three (3) or more persons who conduct, finance, manage, supervise, direct, operate, or own all or part of the business and which has been or remains in substantially continuous operation for a period in excess of fifteen (15) days, or which has conducted operations on at least two (2) days in each of two (2) consecutive weeks, or which has a combined gross revenue of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000) in any single day, or which has entered into a total of at least one hundred (100) gambling transactions in any single day.

“Organized criminal gambling business” does not refer to betting specifically authorized by chapter 4 of title 41 or any act in amendment of that chapter, nor to any form of gambling otherwise licensed or permitted by specific statutory enactment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 127, § 1.

11-51-2.
Organized criminal gambling business.

Whoever shall conduct, finance, manage, supervise, direct or own all or part of an organized criminal gambling business, as defined in this chapter, shall be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years and fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 127, § 1.